New Jersey, session 221, S1371.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 5 of P.L.2007, c.303 ( C.52:17B-5.4a) is amended to read as follows: 5.    The Attorney General shall maintain a central repository for the collection and analysis of information collected pursuant to section 3 of P.L.1966, c.37 (C.52:17B-5.3). Information in the repository shall be made available to the public quarterly, via the department website, and posted no later than six months following the end of each quarter.  The Attorney General may designate the Division of State Police in the Department of Law and Public Safety to be the agency to maintain the repository and provide information from the repository to the public. (cf: P.L.2007, c.303, s.5) 2.    Section 5 of P.L.1966, c.37 (C.52:17B-5.5) is amended to read as follows: 5.    The Attorney General shall render an annual report of the results of the information gathered and collated to the Governor and the Legislature.  This report shall be delivered no later than the first day of the thirteenth month following the end of the period reported. (cf: P.L.1966, c.37, s.5) 3.    This act shall take effect immediately. STATEMENT Currently, no deadline exists for the publishing of crime report data collected quarterly from municipal and county police forces and departments.  This bill requires the Attorney General to make this data public via the Department of Law and Public Safety website within six months of the end of the quarter that is being reported. Similarly, this bill establishes a deadline of one year and one day for the Attorney General to issue the annual crime data report required by statute to the Governor and Legislature.